Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF338.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2436YH (2) 91 ss/ko H.F. 338 Section 1. Section 153.38, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 153.38 Dental assistants ââ scope of practice. 3 A registered dental assistant may perform those services 4 of assistance to a licensed dentist as determined by the 5 board by rule. A registered dental assistant with additional 6 education and training, as provided by the board by rule, 7 may become certified to perform expanded functions or become 8 qualified to participate in dental radiography. A registered 9 dental assistant who has successfully completed expanded 10 function training through the university of Iowa college of 11 dentistry or a program certified by the commission on dental 12 accreditation may place dental sealants on teeth. Services 13 performed by a registered dental assistant shall be performed 14 under supervision of a licensed dentist, but this section shall 15 not be construed to authorize a dental assistant to practice 16 dentistry or dental hygiene. The board shall not adopt rules 17 that delegate to a dental assistant the administration of 18 local anesthesia or the removal of plaque, stain, calculus, or 19 hard natural material except by toothbrush, floss, or rubber 20 cup coronal polish. Every licensed dentist who utilizes the 21 services of a registered dental assistant for the purpose of 22 assistance in the practice of dentistry shall be responsible 23 for acts delegated to the registered dental assistant. A 24 dentist shall delegate to a registered dental assistant only 25 those acts which are authorized to be delegated to registered 26 dental assistants by the board. 27